Hawaii statutes.
§291D-10
Restriction on driver's license and motor vehicle registration.
(a) When the person issued a notice of traffic infraction not involving
parking fails to pay the total amount of fines, fees, surcharges, costs, or
monetary assessments that has been ordered, the court shall cause an entry to
be made in the driver's license record so as to prevent the person from
acquiring or renewing the person's driver's license until the outstanding
amount is paid or the notice of traffic infraction is otherwise disposed of
pursuant to this chapter.

(b) In all cases
where the registered owner of a motor vehicle to which a notice of traffic
infraction has been issued fails to pay the total amount of fines, fees,
surcharges, costs, or monetary assessments that have been ordered, the court
shall cause an entry to be made in the motor vehicle's record so as to prevent
issuance or renewal of the motor vehicle's certificate of registration and
transfer of title to the motor vehicle until the outstanding amount is paid or
the notice of traffic infraction is otherwise disposed of pursuant to this
chapter; provided that if the traffic infraction involves an unpaid parking
violation, this subsection shall not prevent the issuance or renewal of the
motor vehicle's certificate of registration and transfer of title to the motor
vehicle to another person, in which case the clerk of the court shall issue a
clearance to effectuate the registration and transfer of title; and provided
further that in no event shall a clearance:

(1) Absolve the registered
owner of the motor vehicle at the time the parking violation was incurred from
paying the fine;

(2) Prevent any subsequent
issuance or renewal of the motor vehicle's certificate of registration and
transfer of title to the motor vehicle; or

(3) Otherwise encumber the
title of that motor vehicle. [L 1993, c 214, pt of §2; am L 2005, c 48, §5; am
L 2006, c 103, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next